Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts but  ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Public Employees Re-
tirement System, for the following purposes:
(1) Central Administration
Division..................................... $ 3,653,375
(2) Financial and Administrative
Services Division....................... $ 23,358,866
(3) Information Services Division .. $ 27,637,911
(4) Operations Division................... $ 39,391,211
(5) Compliance, Audit and Risk
Division..................................... $ 6,915,257
SECTION 2. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by the Public Em-
ployees Retirement System for refunds,  retirement benefits, deferred compensation and in-
dividual account program payments, health insurance premiums, health  insurance premium
subsidies, third party administrator  costs for health and individual account programs and
Public Employee Benefit Equalization Fund payments are not limited.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 21, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 28, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 2